Hawaii statutes.
§706-645 Revocation of fine or restitution.
(1) A defendant who has been sentenced to pay a fine or restitution and who is
not in contumacious default in the payment thereof may at any time petition the
court which sentenced the defendant for a revocation of the fine or restitution
or of any unpaid portion thereof.

(2) If it appears to the satisfaction of the
court that the circumstances which warranted the imposition of the fine or
restitution have changed, or that it would otherwise be unjust to require
payment, the court may revoke the fine or restitution or the unpaid portion
thereof in whole or in part. Prior to revocation, the court shall afford the
prosecuting attorney an opportunity to be heard. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L
1986, c 314, §37; gen ch 1992]

COMMENTARY ON §706-645

This section allows a defendant, who is not in contumacious
default, to voluntarily appear and seek the relief that would be accorded to
the defendant if the defendant's appearance were involuntary under §706-644.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next